Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.130

Power of eminent domain.

A district may exercise the power of eminent domain to obtain property for its authorized purposes in the same manner as authorized for the city or county legislative authority that established the district.

[ 2005 c 336 s 12; 1987 c 327 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 336: See note following RCW 36.73.015.